Hawaii, session 2026, GM1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Section 46-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding two new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read:
'"’Resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds"
has the same meaning as in article VII, section 12, of the
Hawaii State Constitution that are issued pursuant to this part.
"Transit-oriented development zone" means:
(1) For a county with a population of five hundred
thousand or more:
(A) A transit-oriented development infrastructure
improvement program area pursuant to section
206E-243;
(B) A transit-oriented development special district
established by county ordinance; or
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 2 3218
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(C) An area within a one-half-mile radius of a public
transit center or bus hub, as designated by the
county; or
(2) For a county with a population of less than five
hundred thousand;
(A) A county-designated transit area;
(B) An area situated along major bus routes; or
(C) An area within a one-half-mile radius of a bus
stop, as designated by the respective county."
2. By amending the definitions of "adjustment rate",
"assessment base", and "assessment increment" to read:
""Adjustment rate" means a percentage rate or rates of
adjustment of the assessment base determined by the director of
finance at the time the [tax incrGmcnt] resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity district is established, based on the
historical and projected increases to the assessed values of
taxable real property within the boundary of the [tax iner-emcnt]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity district and the
projected cost increases to the county for servicing the new
developments within the [tax- ■incromont] resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity district.
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx
IIIHIIWIIIIIIIIHIIMillNII

Page 3
S.B. NO.
■ • h.D. 2
CD. 1
"Assessment base" means the total assessed values of all
taxable real property in a [tax in-creme nt] resilient
ijif\ra^t ructjijre f£r shelt^r and e3ui^ district as most recently
certified by the director of finance on the date of creation of
the [tax incrcmont] resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity district.
"Assessment increment" means the amount by which the
current assessed values of taxable real property located within
the boundaries of a [tax inoromGRt] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity district exceeds its assessment base."
3. By amending the definitions of "council" and "county"
to read:
""Council" means the council of the county in which a [tax-
incrcniGnt] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
district is situated.
"County" has the same meaning as [aet forth] in
section 1-22 and means the county in which a [tax-increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity district is
situated."
4. By amending the definition of "project costs" to read:
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
lUMIMMIIIIinHIIIIIIIUlin

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
""Project costs" means expenditures made or estimated to be
made or monetary obligations incurred or estimated to be
incurred by the agency that are listed in a [fe-ox—increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity financing plan
as costs of public works or public improvements in a [tex-
increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
district, plus other costs incidental to the expenditures or
obligations. Project costs include:
(1) Capital costs, including the actual costs of the
construction of public works or public improvements,
new buildings, structures, and fixtures; the actual
costs of the demolition, alteration, remodeling,
repair, or reconstruction of existing buildings,
structures, and fixtures; and the actual costs of the
acquisition, clearing, and grading of land;
(2) Financing costs, including [-j—bat -ftot limi-fe-cd to> ] all
necessary and incidental expenses related to the
issuance of [tax incremc-n4:] resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity bonds and all interest paid to
holders of evidences of indebtedness or other
obligations issued to pay for project costs, any
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx
iniiminDNiniiiinMWii

Page 5
S.B. NO. -
C.D. 1
capitalized interest, the funding or replenishment of
any reserves securing the payment of the resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds, and any
premium paid over the principal amount of the
obligations because of the redemption of the
obligations prior to maturity;
(3) Professional service costs, including architectural,
planning, engineering, marketing, appraisal, financial
consultant, and special services and legal advice;
(4) Imputed administrative costs, including reasonable
charges for the time spent by employees of the agency
in connection with the implementation of a [fee*
incromont] resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity financing plan;
(5) Relocation costs to the extent required by federal or
state law;
(6) Organizational costs, including the costs of
conducting environmental impact studies or other
studies, the costs of publicizing the creation of a
[tax-incromont] re£ilient 2U}Trast ru£tAjre for shelt^
and equity district, and the cost of implementing the
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx
IIIIHfllllMIWniMIHIi

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
[t-ax- inGremert-t] res iJ^ient ijifra^t^;uct ure^or sheltar
and equity financing plan for the [tax ■ i-ncrcment]
resi]J^ent^jmrrast^^ucUire^or shelt^r and je3ui^
district; arid
(7) Payments determined by the county council to be
necessary or convenient to the creation of a
increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity district or to the implementation of the [te*
increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity financing plan for the [tax increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
district."
5. By amending the definitions of "tax increment
district", "tax increment financing plan", and "tax increment
fund" to read:
"["Tax increment] "Resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity district" or "district" means a contiguous or
noncontiguous geographic area designated pursuant to section
46-103 by the county council for the purpose of [tax increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity financing[—]
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx
l■lllnllnNilillllgulnllnl■

Page 7
S.B. NO.
“0’2
CD. 1
provided that the district shall be located entirely within a
transit-oriented development zone.
[ "Ta-x--increment] "Resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity financing plan" means the plan for [tax increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity financing for a
[tux increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
district submitted to the county council. The [ta-x- increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity financing plan
shall contain estimates of: [p^e^-eet]
(1) Project costs; [ameunt]
(2) The amount of [tax- increment] resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity bonds to be issued; [sources]
(3) Sources of revenue to finance or otherwise pay project
costs; [the]
(4) The most recent assessed value of taxable real
property in the district; [the]
Tl^ duration of the district’s existence; and
[-stateffteete ]
(6) Statements from the county's department of finance,
and the county's department of budget, if applicable,
regarding the financial and budgetary impacts on the
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx 7
iniiiniiniiiiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiiD

Page 8 3218
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
county resulting from the proposed [tu-x increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
financing plan.
["TaX"inoroment] "Resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity fund" means a fund [whieh—ohull bo] held by the director
of finance or other fiduciary designated by the county council
and into which all tax increments and other moneys pledged by
the county for payment of [tax incrcmont] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds are paid, and all
proceeds from the sale of [tax increment] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds are deposited, and
from which moneys are disbursed to pay project costs for the
[■tax-increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
district or to satisfy claims of holders of [t-a-x- increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds issued for
the district."
6. By repealing the definition of "tax increment bonds".
[ "•^^^Pax-^rnenement—mean—feendsT—nedes-;—interim
certificateo/—deben-tures>—or-ether obligations issued purouant
■fee—fedi-s—pandr-" ]
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx
MBHliMinnillllHI

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 46-104, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
”§46-104 County powers. A county may exercise any power
necessary and convenient to establish [tax inercfscnt] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity districts, including the
power to:
(1) Create [t-ax ineremcnt] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity districts within a transit-oriented
development zone and determine the boundaries of the
districts; provided that the county shall not
establish the district unless the county council first
adopts a resolution that contains detailed findings of
facts demonstrating that the financing of the proposed
public works or public improvements through a
community facilities district pursuant to section
46-80.1, or the Hawaii community development authority
transit-oriented development infrastructure
improvement district program has been utilized to the
maximum feasible extent, or that the financing is
legally or financially infeasible, thereby exhausting
those options before or in conjunction with, the
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx
lllliniHIIMUIIIIIIilWiMIIH

Page 10
S.B. NO. -
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
issuance of res iJJ^ent infrast ructure^£r shel^er and
equity bonds; provided further that for purposes of
this paragraph, financial infeasibility is strictly
limited to circumstances in which the county council
finds, based on independent financial analysis, that
the imposition of community facilities district
as^e^sments or special taxes would2
(A) Render housing units unaffordable to the specific
income groups the project is intended to serve;
(B) yiolat^o£conflj^ct with a ffo£dabil itj;;coyenant^
federal or state housing program requirements, or
rent restrictions applicable to the project; or
(C) Cause the project to fail to meet standard
industry thresholds for debt service coverage or
financial feasibility, thereby preventing the
project from proceeding;
provided further that no district shall include any
land classified as an agricultural district pursuant
to chapter 205;
(2) Issue [tax fnoroment] resjJJ^ent 2jiifra s;tructuTe for
shelter and e3ui^ bonds;
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 10
iHiiiiiiiingiiiniiiimiM

Page 11
S.B. NO.
SK2
C.D. 1
(3) Deposit tax increments into the [tax inoromont]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity fund
created for a [tax i-ncrcmcnfe] resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity district; and
(4) Enter into agreements, including agreements with [-the]
any redevelopment agency and owners or developers of
project lands and bondholders, determined to be
necessary or convenient to implement redevelopment
plans or community development plans, as the case may
be, and achieve their purposes."
SECTION 3. Section 46-105, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) If a county exercises the power allowed under this
part, then commencing with the first payment of real property
taxes levied by the county subsequent to the time a [tex
incr-emenfe] district takes effect, receipts from real property
taxes shall be allocated and paid over as follows:
(1) The amount of real property tax produced from the
assessment base shall be paid to the county general
fund; and
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 11
liliHHHHIBUIIllHHmilH

Page 12
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) The tax increments produced from the assessment
increment in the [tax- inorement] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity district shall
be applied as follows:
(A) First, an amount equal to the installment of (i)
principal and interest falling due of any [tax
-inc-rement-] resilient infrastructure for shelter
and equity bonds, or (ii) any project cost
approved by the county, shall be deposited into
the [feax-inercment] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity fund established for the [tax
-increment] £es3JAent in^rast^ucture fbr shelt^
and equity district [t-]^.
(B) Second, an amount equal to the adjustment rate
times the amount of real property tax produced
from the assessment base shall be computed and
paid to the county general fund [-r] ; and
(C) Third, the remaining amount of tax increments, if
any, shall be deposited into the [tax ine-romont]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
fund established for the [feax—inercment]
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx 12
■■IMMinillllMIlilHD

Page 13
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
resiLient JjAfrastxuctAire for shelt^r and e3ui^
district."
SECTION 4. Section 46-106, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§46-106 [Tax Incromente] Resilient Infrastructure for
shelter and equity bonds. (a) A county may issue [-fee*
-incromont] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
bonds, the proceeds of which may be used to pay project costs
for a [tax incrcmont] resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity district or to satisfy claims of bondholders. The county
may issue refunding bonds [pee-vie'uoly iosucd by the county] for
the purpose of paying or retiring resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity bonds previously issued by the county, or in
exchange for [tcx-inerGmcnt] resilient infrastructure for
IS shelter and equity bonds previously issued by the county.
Principal and interest on [tax--iftGrcfftent] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds shall be made
payable, as to both principal and interest, solely from the [-fee*
incremont] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity fund
established for the [feax incr-emont] resilient infrastructure for
sheLt^^arid e3ul^ district.
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 13
inMinnffliMiiiiHininiii

Page 14
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
A county may provide in its contract with the owners or
holders of the [tax-ineremcnt] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity bonds that the county will pay into the [tax
incromont] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity fund
all or any part of the revenue or money produced or received as
a result of the operation or sale of a facility acquired,
improved, or constructed pursuant to a redevelopment plan or
community development plan, as the case may be, to be used to
pay principal and interest on the [tax increment] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds and, if a county so
agrees, the owners or holders of the [tax i-ncremeftt-] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds may have a lien or
mortgage on any facility acquired, improved, or constructed with
the proceeds of the [tax incremcRft] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity bonds.
(b) [Tax increment] Res iJAent jmfra st£ucture^or shelt^
and equity bonds, and the income therefrom, issued pursuant to
this part shall be exempt from all state and county taxation,
except estate and transfer taxes.
The bonds shall be authorized by ordinance and may be
issued in one or more series. The [to-x increment] resilient
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 1
nmiiiiiiiiiinniiiiNii

Page 15
S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds of each issue shall
be dated, be payable upon demand or mature at a time or times
not exceeding thirty years from their date of issuance, bear
interest at a rate or rates, be in a denomination or
denominations, be in registered form, have a rank or priority,
be executed in a manner, be payable in a medium of payment at a
place or places, and be subject to terms of redemption (with or
without premium), be secured in a manner, and have other
characteristics as may be provided by the ordinance providing
for issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture or mortgage
issued in connection with the bonds. The county may sell [-ten
increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds
in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such
price as it may determine.
(c) Prior to the preparation of definitive [tax inercmont]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds, the
county may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds
exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds have been
executed and are available for delivery.
(d) Should any bond issued under this part become
mutilated or be lost, stolen, or destroyed, the county may cause
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 15

Page 16
S.B. NO.
h.D. 2
C.D. 1
a new bond of like date, number, and tenor to be executed and
delivered in exchange and substitution for, and upon the
cancellation of such mutilated bond, or in lieu of and in
substitution for such lost, stolen, or destroyed bond. Such new
bond shall not be executed or delivered until the holder of the
mutilated, lost, stolen, or destroyed bond:
(1) Has paid reasonable expenses and charges in connection
therewith;
(2) In the case of a lost, stolen, or destroyed bond, has
filed with the county or its fiduciary satisfactory
evidence that such bond was lost, stolen, or
destroyed, and that the holder was owner thereof; and
(3) Has furnished indemnity satisfactory to the county.
(e) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this part or
any recital in any [tax increment] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity bond issued under this part, all [ta*
increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds
shall be deemed to be investment securities under the Uniform
Commercial Code, chapter 490, subject only to the provisions
pertaining to registration.
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 16
iiHNiniiiHiiinio^^

Page 17
S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
(f) In any suit, action, or other proceeding involving the
validity or enforceability of a bond issued under this part or
the security for a bond or note issued under this part, a bond
reciting in substance that it had been issued by the county for
a [tax increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity district shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued
for that purpose, and the development or redevelopment of the
district conclusively shall be deemed to have been planned,
located, and carried out as provided by this part.
(g) All banks, trust companies, savings banks and
institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan
associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying
on a banking or investment business; all insurance companies,
insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an
insurance business; and all personal representatives,
administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries
legally may invest sinking funds, money, or other funds
belonging to them or within their control in [tax increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds issued by
a county pursuant to this part. The bonds shall be authorized
security for all public deposits. Any person, political
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiiiniiMMiHiiiiinnii

Page 18
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
subdivision, and officer, public or private, are authorized to
use funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of [t-a*
iftGrcmonfe] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
bonds. This part does not relieve any person of the duty to
exercise reasonable care in selecting securities.
(h) [] Resilient infrastructure for shelter
and equity bonds shall be payable only out of the [-fe-ax
inoromont] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity fund.
The county council may pledge irrevocably all or a part of the
fund for payment of the bonds. The part of the fund pledged in
payment thereafter shall be used only for the payment of the
bonds or interest or redemption premium, if any, on the bonds
until the bonds have been fully paid. A holder of the bonds
shall have a lien against the fund for payment of the bonds and
interest thereon and may either at law or in equity protect and
enforce such lien.
(i) No officer of the county2_ including any officer
executing [taxincrement] resilient infrastructure for shelter
and equity bonds2_ shall be liable for the [tax increment]
resilient infrastructure for shelter, and equity bonds by reason
of the issuance thereof. [Tax increment] Resilient
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 19
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
ijifrast^jjcture for shelter and equi^ bonds issued under this
part shall not be general obligations of the State or county,
nor in any event shall they give rise to a charge against the
general credit or taxing powers of the State or county or be
payable other than as provided by this part. No holder of bonds
issued under this part shall have the right to compel any
exercise of the taxing power of the State or county to pay such
bonds or the interest thereon, and no moneys other than the
moneys in the [tax -inoremenb] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity fund pledged to the bonds shall be applied to
the payment thereof. [Tax increment] Resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity bonds issued under this part shall state
these restrictions on their face.
(j) The [tax -incremeftt-] resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity bonds bearing the signature or facsimile
signature of officers in office on the date of the signing
thereof shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes,
notwithstanding that before [the] delivery [theeeef-] and payment
[t-herefee]^, any or all persons whose signatures appear thereon
shall have ceased to be officers of the county.
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 19
■inNIIIMHIHiilliMUIIII

Page 20
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
(k) [T-ax inGrcmcnt] R^siJAent^jjifr^a^t^u£tAire for shelter
and equity bonds shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the
total costs of implementing the [tax inGrcmcnt] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity financing plan for which
they were issued."
SECTION 5. Section 46-110, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§46-110 ifteifeaefvfe] Resilient infrastructure for
shelter and equity fund. (a) Money shall be disbursed from the
[tax incr-emenfe] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
fund for a [tax t-ne-remenfe] resilient infrastructure for shelter
and equity district only to satisfy the claims of holders of
[tax increment] resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity
bonds issued for the [tax- i-ncrcmcnt] resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity district or to pay project costs for the
district, or to make payments to the county as provided by
subsection (c).
(b) Subject to an agreement with the holders of [t^*
incrcmcntl res nj^ent iuifra st ructjure^or shelber and equi^
bonds, money in a [tax- iRcromcntl resilient infrastructure for
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 20
MlilllllHIIHinillllHIill

Page 21
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
shelter and equity fund may be temporarily invested in the same
manner as other funds of the county.
(c) In any year in which the tax increment exceeds the
amount necessary to pay all project costs all
installments of principal and interest of [tax incrontent]
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds issued for
a [tax inc-gemcftt] resilient infrastructure for shelter and
equity district falling due, the funding or replenishment of any
reserves securing the payment of any resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity bonds, and the amount paid to the county
general fund pursuant to section 46-105(b)(2)(B), and subject to
any agreement with bondholders, any excess money in the fund at
the option of the county council, shall be used to redeem or
purchase any outstanding [tax inorcmcnt] resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds issued for the
district, discharge the pledge of tax increment therefor, be
paid into an escrow account dedicated to the payment of [eaeh]
the bonds, be paid over to the county general fund, or any
combination thereof."
SECTION 6. Sections 46-101, 46-103, 46-107, 46-108,
46-109, 46-111, and 46-112, Hawaii Revised Statutes, are amended
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
lOillMilliUlliinilllllBI

Page 22 S.B. NO. S’.
C.D. 1
by substituting the term "resilient infrastructure for shelter
and equity", or similar term, wherever the term "tax increment",
or similar term, appears as the context requires.
PART II
SECTION 7. Section 47C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§47C-1 Definitions. As used in sections 47C-1 through
47C-6, the following words and terms shall have the following
meanings or inclusions:
"Chairperson of the finance committee" [ohall meaft] means
the chairperson of the finance committee of the council of the
county, or if the council of the county does not have a finance
committee, the member of the council appointed by the council to
perform the functions required by this chapter to be performed
by the chairperson of the finance committee of the council.
"Corporation counsel" [ohall mean] means the chief legal
advisor or legal representative of the county.
"County" [shall include] includes each county of the State,
including the city and county of Honolulu.
"Director of finance" [-shei-tHEfteeft] means the director of
finance of the county, or if the county does not have a director
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
IliilillllUIIIIIIIH

Page 23
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
CD. 1
of finance, the officer of the county in whom is vested the
functions and powers of maintaining the treasury of the county
and issuing and selling, paying interest on, and redeeming bonds
of the county.
"Fiscal year" [ehaii—meaft] means the fiscal year of the
county as defined in section 46-41.
"Special assessment bonds" [ahail^-meaft] means bonds issued
under special improvement statutes when the only security for
[ouch] the bonds is the assessments or special taxes levied and
assessed under those statutes or properties subject to the
assessments or special taxes.
As used in sections 47C-1 through 47C-6, the words or terms
"bonds", "general obligation bonds", "resilient infrastructure
for shelter and equity bonds", "net revenue", "net user tax
receipts", "reimbursable general obligation bonds", "revenue
bonds", "special purpose revenue bonds", and "user tax" shall
have the respective meanings and inclusions given to [©«eh]
those words and terms in [■&eet-teH-^72—ef—art-teie—
cons-t-itution. ] article VII, section 12, of the Hawaii State
Constitution."
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 23
imiiiHiiwniiniiMiiiiii

Page 24
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 8. Section 47C-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§47C-2 Determination of funded debt. Within ninety days
after the first day of each fiscal year, the director of finance
of each county shall ascertain and set forth in a tabular
summary the total indebtedness of the county outstanding and
unpaid as of the first day of [ouch] that fiscal year. The
summary shall include the following:
(1) An itemization of the total principal amount of all
general obligation bonds, reimbursable general
obligation bonds, revenue bonds, special assessment
bonds, special purpose revenue bonds, resilient
infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds, and all
other bonds of the county outstanding and unpaid,
including bonds [which] that may be excluded under
clauses 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, [and] 9, and 10 of
[section 13 of articlc-VII of the constitution]
article VII, section 13, of the Hawaii State
Constitution when determining the funded debt of the
county for the purposes of that section together with
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 24
imimiiiiiiiMMiminiiniiH

Page 25
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
a grand total of [eae^] the total principal
amounts
(2) The total principal amount of all bonds of the State
required by clause [-P-h] 7 of [section 13 of articlo
VII of the eenotitution] article VII, section 13, of
the Hawaii State Constitution to be included when
determining the funded debt of the county for the
purposes of that section [—12.
(3) A grand total of the total principal amounts set forth
in the summary pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2)[—]£
(4) An itemization of the total of the principal amount of
all general obligation bonds, reimbursable general
obligation bonds, revenue bonds, special assessment
bonds, [eftd] special purpose revenue bonds, and
resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds
of the county outstanding and unpaid [whieh] th^ may
be excluded under clauses 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8,
9, and 10 of [ocction-13—e^—Vi4—ef—the
constitution] article VII, section 13, of the Hawaii
State Constitution when determining the total funded
debt of the county for the purposes of that section,
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
MMMMIIIinnHilH

Page 26
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
together with a grand total of [e«eh] the total
principal amounts[—]; and
(5) The difference between the grand total principal
amount set forth in the summary pursuant to
paragraph (3) and the grand total principal amount set
forth in the summary pursuant to paragraph (4).
The director of finance shall also prepare and attach to
the tabular summary [ouch] the supporting schedules as may be
required to set forth in detail the bonds included in the
itemizations required by paragraphs (1) and (4). [Such] The
supporting schedules shall also set forth or make reference to
the relevant statutory, charter, ordinance, or other legal
provision, and the relevant figures of assessment collections,
revenues, user tax receipts, cost of operation, maintenance and
repair, net revenues, net user tax receipts, reimbursements to
the general fund, and other financial information, justifying
the inclusion of [ouoh] t^ bonds in the itemization required by
paragraph (4). The director of finance shall indicate in the
supporting schedules whether the financial findings and figures
are based upon the records of the director's office or upon
audited statements and reports, and if based upon the latter.
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx 26

Page 27
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
shall identify in the schedules the audited reports and
statements."
SECTION 9. Section 47C-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§47C-3 Supplemental determination. Whenever the county
proposes to issue bonds, the director of finance shall prepare a
supplemental summary of the indebtedness of the county setting
forth [therein ouch] the information and findings as of a date
within thirty days of the delivery of [ouch] the bonds as will
bring up to date and make current the most recent summary
prepared in accordance with the provisions of section 47C-2.
The director of finance shall also prepare and attach to [-sueh]
the supplemental summary [eaeh] the supporting schedules [ee]
that may be required to set forth in detail the variations and
changes from the summary prepared in accordance with
section 47C-2, including [-sueh] the legal and financial findings
[•ae] that will justify any changes in the itemizations set forth
in [o-ueh] the previous summary pursuant to the requirements of
[paragraph——ef—seefeioft—St] section 47C-2 (4 ) . If all the
bonds proposed to be issued may be excluded when determining the
funded debt of the county for the purposes of [acction 13 of
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx 27

Page 28
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
artiolo VII of the oonotitution] article VII, section 13, of the
Hawaii State Constitution by reason of the provisions of
clauses 2 [-ej?] , 4, or 10 of that section, the supplemental
summary and supporting schedules may be limited to [eueh] those
bonds and findings as are necessary to justify [ouch] the
exclusion under [such] those clauses.
In the event proceeds of the bonds proposed to be issued
are to be applied to the retirement in the then fiscal year of
outstanding bonds, including notes issued in anticipation of the
issuance of the bonds proposed to be issued, for the purpose of
applying the provisions of clause 1 of [section 13 of artiolo
VII of the oonotitution] article VII, section 13, of the Hawaii
State Constitution to the bonds to be retired, that amount of
[eueh] the proceeds to be [ee] applied may be considered and
treated as moneys irrevocably set aside for the payment of
[e«eh’] the bonds . "
PART III
SECTION 10. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 11. This Act shall take effect upon its approval
and upon ratification of a constitutional amendment expressly
2026-2347 SB3218 CDl SMA-l.docx 2

Page 29
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
providing that the legislature may authorize the counties to
issue resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds and
excluding resilient infrastructure for shelter and equity bonds
from determinations of the funded debt of the counties.
2026-2347 SB3218 GDI SMA-l.docx 29
IIIMiilllillllNilinillH

S.B. NO.
3^2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 22nd day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 3218, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
219-26

SB No. 3218, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives